Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 1. Depositions

§§ 1231-1247.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 1248.
Depositions to be used outside State; commissioners of other states; law governing.

A person who is appointed or commissioned by the governor or a court of record of another state to take depositions in this State to be used in the other state shall have the same power to take depositions as the Supreme Court may by rule provide for an officer or other person authorized to take depositions for use within the State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 47, eff. March 29, 1972.

§§ 1249-1251.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.